Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,115
Immediate temporary
stay imposed by natural resources district; department; powers and duties.

(1) Whenever a natural resources district imposes an immediate
temporary stay for one hundred eighty days in accordance with subsection (2)
of section 46-707, the department may place an immediate temporary stay without
prior notice or hearing on the issuance of new surface water natural-flow
appropriations for one hundred eighty days in the area, river basin, subbasin,
or reach of the same area included in the natural resources district's temporary
stay, except that the department shall not place a temporary stay on new surface
water natural-flow appropriations that are necessary to alleviate an emergency
situation involving the provision of water for human consumption or public
health or safety.

(2) The department shall hold at least one public hearing
on the matter within the affected area within the period of the one-hundred-eighty-day
temporary stay, with the notice of hearing given as provided in section 46-743,
prior to making a determination as to imposing a stay or conditions in accordance
with section 46-234 and subsection (11) of section 46-714. The
department may hold the public hearing in conjunction with the natural resources
district's hearing.

(3) Within forty-five days after a hearing pursuant to this
section, the department shall decide whether to exempt from the immediate
temporary stay the issuance of appropriations for which applications were
pending prior to the declaration commencing the stay but for which the application
was not approved prior to such date, to continue the stay, or to allow the
issuance of new surface water appropriations.

Laws 2007, LB701, § 16;

Laws 2009, LB483, § 1.